Utah statutes.
63G-6-419 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Determinations final except when arbitrary and capricious.

The determinations required by Subsections 63G-6-401(6), 63G-6-408(1) and (6), Sections 63G-6-410, 63G-6-411, 63G-6-413, Subsection 63G-6-415(4), Section 63G-6-416, and Subsection 63G-6-417(2) are final and conclusive unless they are arbitrary and capricious or clearly erroneous.

